New York, session 2025-2026, A6126.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The general municipal law is amended by adding a new 2 section 120-dd to read as follows: 3 § 120-dd. Prohibition against taxes on certain property in municipal 4 water districts. 1. The establishment of or existence of a municipal 5 water district in a city, town, village or of a joint water district 6 shall not result in any levy, charge, tax or assessment on any property 7 which uses private well water as its water supply. 8 2. The establishment of or existence of a municipal sewer district in 9 a city, town, village or of a joint sewer district shall not result in 10 any levy, charge, tax or assessment on any property which uses a septic 11 system for the treatment of wastewater. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08687-01-5